Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1410XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1410XD (12) 91
nls/ko

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
STRATEGIC INFRASTRUCTURE PROGRAM
Section 1. Section 15.117A, subsection 6, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 2. Section 15.313, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
The Iowa innovation council A committee appointed pursuant
to section 15.117A, subsection 7, shall review each application
received by the economic development authority for financial
assistance under the program and shall make recommendations to
the board regarding all of the following:
DIVISION II
BROWNFIELDS, GRAYFIELDS, AND REDEVELOPMENT TAX CREDITS
Sec. 3. Section 15.291, subsections 3 and 11, Code 2025, are
amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 4. Section 15.293A, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
The amount of the tax credit shall be determined by the board
in conjunction with the council. However, the tax credit and
shall not exceed the following amount, as applicable:
Sec. 5. Section 15.293B, subsection 1, paragraphs b, d, and
h, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
b. The authority shall accept and, in conjunction with
the council, review applications for tax credits provided in
section 15.293A and, with the approval of the council, make tax
credit award recommendations regarding the applications to the
board. The authority may engage outside experts to complete a
technical, financial, or other review.
d. Upon review of an application, the authority may
register the project with the redevelopment tax credits
program. If the authority registers the project, the authority
may, in conjunction with the council, make a preliminary
determination as to the amount of tax credit for which an award
recommendation will be made to the board.
h. If the applicant for a tax credit provided in section
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-1- nls/ko 1/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
15.293A has also applied to an agency of the federal government
or to the authority, the board, or any other agency of state
government for additional financial assistance, the authority,
the council, and the board shall consider the amount of funding
to be received from such public sources when making a tax
credit award pursuant to this section.
Sec. 6. Section 15.293B, subsection 1, paragraph f,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) All completed applications shall be reviewed and scored
on a competitive basis by the council and the board authority.
In reviewing and scoring applications, the council and the
board authority may consider any factors the council and board
deem authority deems appropriate for a competitive application
process, including but not limited to the financial need,
quality, and feasibility of a qualifying redevelopment project.
Sec. 7. Section 15.293B, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
c. Any other information deemed necessary by the board
and the council authority to review and score the application
pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 8. Section 15.293B, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2025, are
amended to read as follows:
4. A registered project shall be completed within thirty
months of the date the project was registered unless the
authority, upon recommendation of the council and with the
approval of the board, provides additional time to complete the
project. If the registered project is not completed within
the time required, the project is not eligible to claim a
redevelopment tax credit provided in section 15.293A.
5. a. The investor shall engage a certified public
accountant authorized to practice in this state to conduct an
examination of the project in accordance with the American
institute of certified public accountants’ statements on
standards for attestation engagements. Upon completion of a
registered project, an audit of the project, completed by an
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-2- nls/ko 2/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
independent certified public accountant licensed in this state,
the examination, along with a statement of the amount of final
qualifying investment, shall be submitted to the authority.
b. Upon review of the audit and verification of the amount
of the qualifying investment, examination and statement
submitted pursuant to paragraph “a”, the authority may issue a
tax credit certificate to the investor stating the amount of
tax credit under section 15.293A the investor may claim.
Sec. 9. REPEAL. Sections 15.292, 15.293, 15.294, and
15.295, Code 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 10. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. On the effective date of this
division of this Act, any unencumbered or unobligated moneys
remaining in the brownfield redevelopment fund created in
section 15.293 are transferred to a fund or funds established
pursuant to section 15.335B, subsection 1, paragraph “a”, as
determined by the economic development authority.
DIVISION III
COMMUNITY ATTRACTION AND TOURISM, AND VISION IOWA —— REQUIRED
BENEFITS
Sec. 11. REPEAL. Section 15F.106, Code 2025, is repealed.
Sec. 12. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies
to an applicant awarded financial assistance under both the
vision Iowa program established in section 15F.302, and the
community attraction and tourism program established in section
15F.202, on or after the effective date of this division of
this Act.
Sec. 13. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this
Act applies retroactively to an applicant awarded financial
assistance under both the vision Iowa program established in
section 15F.302, and the community attraction and tourism
program established in section 15F.202, prior to the effective
date of this division of this Act.
DIVISION IV
COMMUNITY ATTRACTION AND TOURISM PROGRAM, AND SPORTS TOURISM
MARKETING AND INFRASTRUCTURE PROGRAM —— APPLICATION REVIEW
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-3- nls/ko 3/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 14. Section 15F.203, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. A The director of the authority shall appoint a review
committee composed of five members of the board shall with
relevant expertise to review community attraction and tourism
program applications forwarded to the board and. The review
committee shall make recommendations regarding the applications
to the board.
Sec. 15. Section 15F.402, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. A The director of the authority shall appoint a review
committee composed of five members of the board shall with
relevant expertise to review sports tourism marketing and
infrastructure program applications forwarded to the board and.
The review committee shall make recommendations regarding the
applications to the authority.
DIVISION V
HISTORIC PRESERVATION TAX CREDIT
Sec. 16. Section 404A.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 17. Section 404A.1, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. d. The property is not a single-family
dwelling unit, unless the project will result in two or more
new single-family dwelling units that were not available
for occupancy as residential housing during the immediately
preceding consecutive six months prior to commencement of
the project, and the dwelling units are located in the same
neighborhood, as confirmed by the authority. The two or more
new single-family dwelling units must be made available for
occupancy as a result of the rehabilitation project. The
authority may promulgate by rule criteria used by the authority
to determine if a property is a single-family dwelling unit,
and qualifies as a qualified rehabilitation project under this
paragraph.
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-4- nls/ko 4/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 18. Section 404A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 8. “Registration date” means the date on
which the authority notifies an eligible taxpayer of successful
registration of the taxpayer’s qualified rehabilitation project
pursuant to section 404A.3, subsection 2.
Sec. 19. Section 404A.3, subsection 3, paragraph b,
subparagraphs (4) and (5), Code 2025, are amended to read as
follows:
(4) The commencement date of by which the qualified
rehabilitation project must commence, which shall not be no
later than the end of the fiscal year in which the agreement
is entered into one calendar year from the registration date.
Upon application of the eligible taxpayer, the authority may,
at the discretion of the authority, extend the date by which
the qualified rehabilitation project must commence up to an
additional twelve consecutive months.
(5) (a) The completion date of by which the qualified
rehabilitation project, which shall be within thirty-six
months of the commencement date must be completed, which shall
be no later than three consecutive calendar years from the
registration date. The qualified rehabilitation project shall
be considered complete as of the date the property that is the
subject of the qualified rehabilitation project is placed in
service, as described in 26 U.S.C. §47.
(b) Upon application of the eligible taxpayer, the
authority may, at the discretion of the authority, extend the
date by which the qualified rehabilitation project must be
complete up to an additional twelve consecutive months.
(c) Upon application of the eligible taxpayer made prior
to the expiration of an extension under subparagraph (b), the
authority may, at the discretion of the authority, extend
the date by which the qualified rehabilitation project must
be complete up to an additional twelve consecutive months.
The qualified eligible taxpayer must substantiate to the
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-5- nls/ko 5/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
satisfaction of the authority that the requested extension is
warranted due to extenuating circumstances outside the control
of the eligible taxpayer.
(d) An application by an eligible taxpayer under
subparagraph division (b) or (c) shall be made in the manner
and form prescribed by the authority by rule.
Sec. 20. Section 404A.4, subsection 1, paragraph a,
unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
Except as provided in subsections 2, and 3, and 4, the
authority shall not award in any one fiscal year an amount of
tax credits provided in section 404A.2 in excess of forty-five
million dollars.
Sec. 21. Section 404A.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. a. If, during the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2025, or any fiscal year thereafter, the authority
receives an application for a qualified rehabilitation project
with qualified rehabilitation expenditures that, if registered
by the authority, makes the eligible taxpayer eligible for tax
credits of ten million dollars or more, the authority may award
tax credits during the fiscal year in which the application
is received in an amount not to exceed twenty percent more
than the maximum aggregate tax credit award limit specified in
subsection 1.
b. Tax credits awarded pursuant to this subsection shall be
considered for purposes of calculating the maximum aggregate
tax credits awarded pursuant to subsection 1 in the immediately
succeeding fiscal year.
DIVISION VI
HOMELESSNESS —— IOWA FINANCE AUTHORITY
Sec. 22. Section 16.5F, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. a. The authority shall may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 17A for carrying out the duties of the authority
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-6- nls/ko 6/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
pursuant to this section.
b. The authority shall may establish internal rules of
procedure consistent with the provisions of this section.
c. Rules adopted or internal rules of procedure established
pursuant to paragraph “a” or “b” shall be consistent with the
requirements of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance
Act, 42 U.S.C. §11301 et seq.
DIVISION VII
TITLE GUARANTY BOARD —— ELIMINATION
Sec. 23. Section 16.1A, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
5. The board may, by resolution, delegate to the
agricultural development board, title guaranty division board,
director, or other authority employee such of its powers, under
such terms and conditions, as it deems appropriate.
Sec. 24. Section 16.2A, Code 2025, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
16.2A Title guaranty division.
A title guaranty division is created within the authority.
The division may also be referred to as Iowa title guaranty.
The powers of the division relating to the issuance of
title guaranties are vested in and shall be exercised by the
board. The director shall appoint an attorney as director
of the division. The appointment of, and compensation for,
the division director shall be exempt from the merit system
under chapter 8A, subchapter IV, part 2. The net earnings of
the division, beyond that necessary for reserves, backing,
guaranties issued, or to otherwise implement the public
purposes and programs authorized, shall not inure to the
benefit of any person other than the state and are subject to
section 16.2, subsection 9.
Sec. 25. Section 16.91, subsections 1, 3, and 6, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
1. The authority, through the Iowa title guaranty division,
shall initiate and operate a program in which the division
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-7- nls/ko 7/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
shall offer guaranties of real property titles in this state.
The terms, conditions, and form of the guaranty contract shall
be forms approved by the division board. The division shall
fix a charge for the guaranty in an amount sufficient to permit
the program to operate on a self-sustaining basis, including
payment of administrative costs and the maintenance of an
adequate reserve against claims under the Iowa title guaranty
program. A title guaranty fund is created in the office of
the treasurer of state. Funds collected under this program
shall be placed in the title guaranty fund and are available
to pay all claims, necessary reserves and all administrative
costs of the Iowa title guaranty program. Moneys in the fund
shall not revert to the general fund and interest on the moneys
in the fund shall be deposited in the housing trust fund
established created in section 16.181 and shall not accrue to
the general fund. If the authority board in consultation with
the division board determines that there are surplus funds in
the title guaranty fund after providing for adequate reserves
and operating expenses of the division, the surplus funds shall
be transferred to the housing assistance fund created pursuant
to section 16.40.
3. With the approval of the authority board, the division
and its board shall consult with the insurance division of the
department of insurance and financial services in developing
a guaranty contract acceptable to the secondary market and
developing any other feature of the program with which the
insurance division may have special expertise. Except as
provided in this subsection, the Iowa title guaranty program
is not subject to the jurisdiction of or regulation by the
insurance division or the commissioner of insurance.
6. Prior to the issuance of a title guaranty, the division
shall require evidence that an abstract of title to the
property in question has been brought up-to-date and certified
by a participating abstractor in a form approved by division
rules acceptable to the division, and a title opinion issued by
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-8- nls/ko 8/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a participating attorney in the form approved in the rules a
form acceptable to the division stating the attorney’s opinion
as to the title. The division shall require evidence of the
abstract being brought up-to-date and the abstractor shall
retain evidence of the abstract as determined by the board
division.
Sec. 26. Section 16.92, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 27. Section 16.92, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
e. “Mortgage” means a mortgage or mortgage lien on an
interest in real property in this state given to secure a loan
in an original principal amount equal to or less than the
maximum principal amount as determined by the division board
and adopted by the authority pursuant to rules promulgated
under chapter 17A.
Sec. 28. Section 16.93, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
The authority, through the Iowa title guaranty division,
may issue a closing protection letter to a person to whom a
proposed title guaranty is to be issued, upon the request of
the person, if the division issues a commitment for title
guaranty or title guaranty certificate. The closing protection
letter shall conform to the terms of coverage and form of the
instrument as approved by the division board and may indemnify
a person to whom a proposed title guaranty is to be issued
against loss of settlement funds due to only the following acts
of the division’s named participating attorney, participating
abstractor, or closer:
Sec. 29. Section 16.93, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. The division board shall establish the amount of coverage
to be provided and may distinguish between classes of property
including, but not limited to, residential, agricultural, or
commercial, provided that the total amount of coverage provided
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-9- nls/ko 9/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
by the closing protection letter shall not exceed the amount
of the commitment or title guaranty to be issued. Liability
under the closing protection letter shall be coextensive with
liability under the certificate to be issued in connection with
a transaction such that payments under the terms of the closing
protection letter shall reduce by the same amount the liability
under the title guaranty certificate and payment under the
title guaranty certificate shall reduce the liability under the
terms of the closing protection letter.
DIVISION VIII
ARTS AND CULTURE
Sec. 30. Section 15.108, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
7. Cultural affairs. To develop the state’s interest in
the areas of the arts, history, and other cultural matters. To
carry out this responsibility, the authority shall:
a. Accept, receive, and administer grants or other funds or
gifts from public or private agencies, including the federal
government, for the authority.
b. Administer the Iowa cultural trust, as advised and
assisted by the Iowa arts council, as provided in subchapter
II, part 30, and do all of the following:
(1) Develop and adopt by rule criteria for the issuance
of trust fund credits by measuring the efforts of qualified
organizations to increase their endowment or other resources
for the promotion of the arts, history, or the sciences and
humanities in Iowa. For purposes of this paragraph, “qualified
organization” means a tax-exempt, nonprofit organization
whose primary mission is to promote the arts, history, or the
sciences and humanities in Iowa. If the authority determines
that a qualified organization has increased the amount of the
qualified organization’s endowment and other resources, the
authority shall certify the amount of increase in the form of
trust fund credits to the treasurer, who shall deposit in the
Iowa cultural trust fund, from moneys received for purposes
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-10- nls/ko 10/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
of the trust fund as provided in section 15.479, subsection
2, an amount equal to the trust fund credits. If the amount
of the trust fund credits issued by the authority exceeds the
amount of moneys available to be deposited in the trust fund as
provided in section 15.479, subsection 2, the outstanding trust
fund credits shall not expire but shall be available to draw
down additional moneys which become available to be deposited
in the trust fund as provided in section 15.479, subsection 2.
(2) Develop and implement, in accordance with subchapter
II, part 30, a grant application process for grants issued to
qualified organizations.
(3) Develop and adopt by rule criteria for the approval of
Iowa cultural trust grants. The criteria shall include but
shall not be limited to the future stability and sustainability
of a qualified organization.
(4) Compile, in consultation with the Iowa arts council,
a list of grant applications recommended for funding in
accordance with the amount available for distribution as
provided in section 15.481, subsection 3.
(5) Monitor the allocation and use of grant moneys by all
qualified organizations to determine whether moneys are used
in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph “b” and
subchapter II, part 30.
c. b. Design a comprehensive, statewide, long-range plan
with the assistance of the Iowa arts council to develop the
arts in Iowa. The authority is designated as the state agency
for carrying out the plan.
d. c. By rule, establish Establish advisory groups as
necessary for the receipt of federal funds or grants or the
administration of any of the authority’s programs.
e. Develop and implement fee-based educational programming
opportunities, including preschool programs, related to arts,
history, and other cultural matters for Iowans of all ages.
f. Conduct surveys of existing art and cultural programs
and activities within the state, including but not limited to
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-11- nls/ko 11/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
music, theater, dance, painting, sculpture, architecture, and
allied arts and crafts. The authority shall submit, or include
as part of the annual report under section 15.107B, a report
on the survey to the governor and to the general assembly no
later than ten calendar days after the commencement of each
first session of the general assembly recommending appropriate
legislation or other action as the authority deems appropriate.
g. d. Establish and administer a film office. The purpose
of the film office is to assist legitimate film, television,
and video producers in Provide technical assistance for the
production of film, television, and video projects in the
state, and to increase the fiscal impact on the state’s economy
of film, television, and video projects produced in the state.
Sec. 31. Section 15.274, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
15.274 Promotional program for national historic landmarks
and cultural and entertainment districts.
The economic development authority, in cooperation with
the state department of transportation, shall establish
and administer a program designed to promote knowledge of
and access to buildings, sites, districts, structures, and
objects located in this state that have been designated by the
secretary of the interior of the United States as a national
historic landmark, unless the national historic landmark is
protected under section 22.7, subsection 20, and certified
cultural and entertainment districts, as established pursuant
to section 15.438. The program shall be designed to maximize
the visibility and visitation of national historic landmarks
in this state and buildings, sites, structures, and objects
located in certified cultural and entertainment districts,
as established pursuant to section 15.438. Methods used to
maximize the visibility and visitation of such locations may
include the use of tourism literature, signage on highways,
maps of the state and cities, and internet sites. For purposes
of this section, “highway” means the same as defined in section
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-12- nls/ko 12/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
325A.1.
Sec. 32. Section 15.436, Code 2025, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
15.436 Arts and culture enhancement fund.
1. The economic development authority shall, pursuant
to section 15.106A, subsection 1, paragraph “o”, establish
the arts and culture enhancement fund to be used for the
purposes of this section. The fund shall consist of any moneys
appropriated by the general assembly for purposes of this
section and any other moneys that are lawfully available to
the authority. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2,
interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall accrue to
the authority and shall be used for purposes of this section.
Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at the end of
each fiscal year shall not revert to any other fund but shall
remain in the fund for expenditure for subsequent fiscal years.
2. The authority shall allocate moneys in the arts and
culture enhancement fund in appropriate amounts to be used for
the following purposes:
a. To provide support to municipal and nonprofit arts and
cultural organizations that serve as significant attractions
or community resources.
b. To support artists and entities that foster artistic and
cultural expression, promote lifelong learning and engagement
in the arts, advance community development goals, or emphasize
Iowa’s diverse heritage through the creation, performance, or
presentation of artworks.
c. To increase access to arts and culture in rural and
underserved communities in the state.
d. For the promotion of and investment in film, television,
and video projects produced in the state.
e. To address other goals and priorities as reflected in
the comprehensive, statewide, long-range plan designed by the
authority with the assistance of the Iowa arts council pursuant
to section 15.108, subsection 7.
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-13- nls/ko 13/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
f. For administrative costs related to this section.
3. The authority may adopt by rule eligibility and priority
criteria for allocation of moneys in the arts and culture
enhancement fund.
Sec. 33. Section 15.465, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The term of office of each member of the Iowa arts
council is three years. The governor shall designate council
may elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from the members
of the council to serve at the pleasure of the governor. All
vacancies shall be filled for the balance of any unexpired term
in the same manner as original appointments. The members of
the council shall not receive compensation for their services,
but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the
council. Members may also be eligible for compensation as
provided in section 7E.6.
Sec. 34. Section 15.466, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
15.466 Duties of Iowa arts council.
The Iowa arts council shall review programs to be supported
and make recommendations on the programs to the director to
ensure that Iowa citizens and communities have access to the
cultural, civic, economic, and educational benefits of the
arts. The council may solicit public input including but not
limited to input on the comprehensive, statewide, long-range
plan created by the authority with the assistance of the Iowa
arts council pursuant to section 15.108, subsection 7.
Sec. 35. Section 15H.6, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. The capacity building activities shall be targeted in
communities that are already working with existing community
improvement programs, including but not limited to the Iowa
great places program established under section 15.439, the
green streets and main street Iowa programs administered by
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-14- nls/ko 14/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the economic development authority, and disaster remediation
activities by communities located within an area declared to be
a disaster area in a declaration issued by the president of the
United States or the governor.
Sec. 36. Section 99F.11, subsection 4, paragraph d,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Five hundred twenty thousand dollars is appropriated
each fiscal year to the economic development authority with
one-half of the moneys allocated for operational support grants
and the remaining one-half allocated for the community cultural
grants program established under for deposit in the arts and
culture enhancement fund established in section 15.436.
Sec. 37. REPEAL. Sections 15.437, 15.438, 15.439, 15.440,
15.441, 15.476, 15.477, 15.478, 15.479, 15.481, and 15.482,
Code 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 38. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. On the effective date of this
division of this Act, all unencumbered and unobligated moneys
remaining in the Iowa great places program fund created in
section 15.440, the Iowa cultural trust fund created in section
15.479, and the Iowa cultural trust grant account created
in section 15.482 are transferred to the arts and culture
enhancement fund established pursuant to section 15.436, as
amended by this division of this Act.
DIVISION IX
CONFORMING CHANGES
Sec. 39. Section 16.6, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
4. The director may establish administrative divisions
within the authority in order to most efficiently and
effectively carry out the authority’s responsibilities,
provided that any creation or modification of authority
divisions be established only after consultation with the board
of the authority.
Sec. 40. Section 16.64, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
LSB 1410XD (12) 91
-15- nls/ko 15/21

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
1. The authority shall publish a notice of intention to
issue bonds or notes. After sixty days from the date of
publication of the notice, an action shall not be brought
questioning the legality of any bonds or notes or the power of
the authority to issue any bonds or notes or to the legality
of any proceedings in connection with the authorization or
issuance of the bonds or notes after determination by the board
of the authority to proceed with the issuance of the bonds or
notes.